North Carolina statutes. Chapter 15. Criminal Procedure.
Article 18. Appeal. [Repealed]

§§ 15-177 through 15-178.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1141, s. 17.

Cross References.

For provisions as to appeals in criminal cases, see

G.S. 15A-1441

et seq.

§§ 15-179 through 15-186.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 711, s. 33.

§ 15-186.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 44, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to credits against the service of sentences and for attainment of prison privileges, see

G.S. 15-196.1

through 15-196.4.